Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.920

Duties and responsibilities imposed by other acts.

Any duties and responsibilities which by other acts are imposed upon a planning commission shall, after June 10, 1959, be performed by a planning agency however constituted.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.920. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 92.]